Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.380

Exemption from payment of fees at state universities, regional universities, and The Evergreen State College—Children and surviving spouses of certain law enforcement officers, firefighters, state patrol officers, or highway workers.

Subject to the limitations of RCW 28B.15.910, the governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall exempt the following students from the payment of all tuition fees and services and activities fees:

(1) Children of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency: PROVIDED, That such persons may receive the exemption only if they begin their course of study at a state-supported college or university within ten years of their graduation from high school; and

(2) Surviving spouses of any law enforcement officer as defined in chapter 41.26 RCW, firefighter as defined in chapter 41.26 or 41.24 RCW, highway worker, or Washington state patrol officer who lost his or her life or became totally disabled in the line of duty while employed by any public law enforcement agency or full-time or volunteer fire department in this state, or was a highway worker while either employed by a general contractor or subcontractor, on a transportation project or employed by a transportation agency.

(3) The governing boards of the state universities, the regional universities, and The Evergreen State College shall report to the education data center on the annual cost of tuition fees and services and activities fees waived for surviving spouses and children under this section. The education data center shall consolidate the reports of the waived fees and annually report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the legislature.

(4) As used in this section, "transportation agency" means any agency, department, or division of a municipal corporation, political subdivision, or other unit of local government in this state, and any agency, department, or division of state government, having as its primary function the construction and maintenance of the highways and roads within the state of Washington. Such an agency, department, or division is distinguished from a transit agency having as one of its functions the highway maintenance, including but not limited to the state department of transportation. A transportation agency under this section does not include a government contractor.

[ 2019 c 144 s 1; 2015 c 46 s 1; 2012 c 229 s 703; 2010 c 261 s 4; 2005 c 249 s 2; 1993 sp.s. c 18 s 10; 1992 c 231 s 9; 1990 c 154 s 1; 1985 c 390 s 23; 1979 c 82 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 322 s 10; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 37; 1973 1st ex.s. c 191 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 279 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 269 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.15.380. Prior: (i) 1947 c 46 s 1; 1921 c 139 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4550. Formerly RCW 28.77.070. (ii) 1921 c 164 s 4, part; RRS s 4572, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.060, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—1993 sp.s. c 18: See note following RCW 28B.12.060.

Effective date—1992 c 231: See note following RCW 28B.10.016.

Severability—1979 c 82: "If any provision of this amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1979 c 82 s 3.]

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 322: See note following RCW 28B.15.065.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 191: "This 1973 amendatory act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect on July 1, 1973." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 191 s 4.]

Severability—1971 ex.s. c 279: See note following RCW 28B.15.005.

"Totally disabled" defined for certain purposes: RCW 28B.15.385.